scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAIO.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     abwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indabwen
     abwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindabwen
     abwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidabwen
     abwen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: abwed
     abwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odabwen
     abwen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ebwed
     adaawangen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawangen
     adaawangen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawangen
     adaawangen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidadaawangen
     adaawangen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odadaawaangen
     adaawangen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawanged
     adaawangen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawanged
     adaawangen+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg: adaawangen
     adaawaagen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawaagen
     adaawaagen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawaagen
     adaawaagen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidadaawaagen
     adaawaagen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odadaawaagen
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indadaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindadaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidadaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: adaawed
     adaawen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odadaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: edaawed
     adoopon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: indadoopon
     adoopon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odadoopon
     adoopon+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: adoopod
     adoopon+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: edoopod
     adoopon+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: adoopon
     agwaniin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nidagwaniin
     agwaniin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwaniin
     agwaniin+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: agwaniid
     agwaniin+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: egwaniid
     agwaniin+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: agwaniin
     agwiin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindagwiin
     agwiin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindagwiinan
     agwiin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odagwiin
     agwiin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+?: odagwiinan
     akakanzhebwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indakakanzhebwen
     akakanzhebwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindakakanzhebwen
     akakanzhebwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidakakanzhebwen
     akakanzhebwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odakakanzhebwen
     akakanzhebwen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: akakanzhebwed
     akakanzhebwen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ekakanzhebwed
     akakanzhebwen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: akakanzhebwen 
     andodamaagen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: ninandodamaagen
     andodamaagen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: onandodamaagen
     andodamaagen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: andodamaaged
     andodamaagen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: endodamaaged
     andodamaagen+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: andodamaagen
     apakwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapakwen
     apakwen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapakwen
     apakwen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apakwed
     apakwen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: epakwed
     apakwen+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aapakwen
     apaabowen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapaabowen
     apaabowen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapaabowen
     apaabowen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapaabowen
     apaabowen+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apaabowed
     apaabowen+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odapaabowen
     apaabowen+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epaabowed
     apenimon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indapenimon
     apenimon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindapenimon
     apenimon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidapenimon
     apenimon+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: apenimod
     apenimon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odapenimon
     apenimon+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: epenimod
     apigaabawin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapigaabawin
     apigaabawin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapigaabawin
     apigaabawin+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apigaabawid
     apigaabawin+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apigaabawin
     apigaabawin+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: epigaabawid
     apikweshimon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindapikweshimon
     apikweshimon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odapikweshimon
     apikweshimon+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: apikweshimod
     apikweshimon+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: epikweshimod
     apikweshimon+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: apikweshimon
     apinikaazon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindapinikaazonan
     apinikaazon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odapinikaazonan
     apinikaazon+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: apinikaazod
     apinikaazon+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: epinikaazod
     asanjigon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indasanjigon
     asanjigon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindasanjigon
     asanjigon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidasanjigon
     asanjigon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odasanjigon
     asanjigon+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: asanjigod
     asanjigon+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: esanjigod
     ataason+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indataason
     ataason+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindataason
     ataason+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidataason
     ataason+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ataasod
     ataason+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odataason
     ataason+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etaasod
     awi'aazon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindawi'aazon
     awi'aazon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindawi'aazonan
     awi'aazon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindawi'aazonan
     awi'aazon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odawi'aazon
     awi'aazon+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+?: odawi'aazonan
     awi'aazon+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: awi'aazod
     awi'aazon+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0: ewi'aazod
     awi'aazon+VAIO+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: awi'aazon
     aakozin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indaakozin
     aakozin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindaakozin
     aakozin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidaakozin
     aakozin+VAIO+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aakozid
     aakozin+VAIO+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: odaakozin
     aakozin+VAIO+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaakozid
